Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-301.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 80-301.01 to 80-337 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Veterans Services Act.

Laws 2017, LB340, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB827, § 1.